Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF959.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2270YH (2) 91 lh/ko H.F. 959 Section 1. VENTILATOR-DEPENDENT RECIPIENTS ââ SERVICES 1 UNDER MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM. The department of health and 2 human services shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A for 3 purposes of the medical assistance program that do all of the 4 following: 5 1. Require ventilator services to be provided to a 6 ventilator-dependent recipient based on need and not on the 7 recipientâs age. 8 2. Permit any qualified provider to provide services to a 9 ventilator-dependent recipient. 10